Utah statutes.
20A-11-1004.   Summary of financial reports of political action committees and corporations.

(1)  The lieutenant governor's office shall prepare a summary of each financial report submitted by each corporation, political action committee, and political issues committee.

(2)  Each summary shall include the following information:

(a)  for each candidate:

(i)  the name of each political action committee and corporation that made expenditures to the candidate; and

(ii)  the aggregate total of expenditures made by each political action committee and corporation to the candidate;

(b)  for each political action committee:

(i)  the name of each individual or organization listed on the financial report that made contributions to the political action committee and the aggregate total of contributions made by each individual or organization listed on the financial report to the political action committee; and

(ii)  the name of each candidate, personal campaign committee, and political action committee that received expenditures from a political action committee and the aggregate total of expenditures made to each candidate, personal campaign committee, and political action committee;

(c)  for each corporation:

(i)  the name of each candidate, personal campaign committee, and political action committee that received expenditures from the corporation, and the aggregate total of expenditures made by the corporation to each candidate, personal campaign committee, and political action committee; and

(ii)  the name of each individual, entity, or group of individuals or entities that received disbursements from the corporation, and the aggregate total of disbursements made by the corporation to each individual, entity, or group of individuals or entities;

(d)  for each political issues committee:

(i)  the name of each individual or organization listed on the financial report that made political issues contributions to the political issues committee and the aggregate total of political issues contributions made by each individual or organization listed on the financial report to the political issues committee; and

(ii)  the name of each individual, entity, or group of individuals or entities that received political issues expenditures from a political issues committee and the aggregate total of political issues expenditures made to each individual, entity, or group of individuals or entities.

